Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Article 2. Local Use Tax

§ 39-16-201.
Definitions.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 186, § 2.

Definitions under article 1 of this chapter apply to this article unless otherwise specified.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 2019 ch. 186, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, repealed (a), which read: "`This article' means W.S.

39-16-201

through

39-16-211

."

§ 39-16-202.
Administration.

The state preempts the field of imposing tax upon sales and storage, use and consumption of tangible personal property as provided by this article. No county, city, town or other political subdivision may impose, levy or collect taxes upon sales or storage, use or consumption of tangible personal property except as provided in this section.

In addition to the state tax imposed under article 1 of this chapter a county or a resort district may impose excise taxes as specified under this article.

Whenever a county or resort district imposes an excise tax on retail sales of tangible personal property, admissions and services made within the county or resort district pursuant to article 2, chapter 15 of this title, the county or resort district shall also impose an excise tax at the same rate on sales made in the county or resort district and storage, use and consumption of tangible personal property in the county or resort district. The purpose of the tax is for general revenue.

No tax shall be imposed under subsection (c) of this section unless the requirements of W.S.

39-16-203

have been satisfied. Satisfaction of the requirements of W.S.

39-16-203

authorizes and requires the imposition of an excise tax under this section at the same rate as the excise tax under article 2 of this chapter.

A county imposing a sales tax pursuant to W.S. 39-15-203(a)(iii), or a resort district imposing a sales tax pursuant to W.S. 39-15-203(a)(iv), is authorized and required to impose a corresponding use tax at the same rate and for the same period of time as for the sales tax.

The administration of the county or resort district use taxes is vested in the department which may prescribe forms and rules and regulations for making returns and for the ascertainment, assessment and collection of the taxes. The department shall keep complete records of all monies received and disbursed by it.

No applicant to the state of Wyoming for grant or loan funds shall be penalized for failure to enact the tax provided in W.S. 39-16-204(a)(ii).

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 45, § 1; 2003, ch. 72, § 2.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 45, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Stated

in

Exxon Corp. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 783 P.2d 685,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 238

(Wyo. 1989).

§ 39-16-203.
Imposition.

Taxable event. The following shall apply:

The following provisions apply to imposition of the general purpose excise tax under W.S. 39-16-204(a)(i):

Except as provided by subparagraph (F) of this paragraph, no tax shall be imposed under W.S. 39-16-204(a)(i) until the proposition to impose the taxes is submitted to the vote of the qualified electors of the county, and a majority of those casting their ballots vote in favor of imposing the taxes. If a county seeks to increase a tax rate previously approved by the qualified electors of the county that increase shall be separately proposed and voted upon, provided that the total amount of the separate propositions is subject to the limitations specified in W.S. 39-16-204(a)(i) and (iii). A county may impose both taxes authorized in W.S. 39-16-204(a)(i) and (ii), but the proposition to impose each tax also shall be individually stated and voted upon. Except as otherwise provided, excise taxes imposed under this paragraph shall commence as provided by W.S.

39-16-207

(c) following the election approving the imposition of the tax;

The proposition to impose an excise tax shall be at the expense of the county and be submitted to the electors of the county upon the receipt by the board of county commissioners of a petition requesting the election signed by at least five percent (5%) of the electors of the county or of a resolution approving the proposition from the governing body of the county and the governing bodies of at least fifty percent (50%) of the incorporated municipalities within the county. If proposed by petition by electors, the number of electors required shall be determined by the number of votes cast at the last general election. The election shall be at the direction and under the supervision of the board of county commissioners;

The proposition may be submitted at an election held on a date authorized under W.S.

22-21-103

. A notice of election shall be given in at least one (1) newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the election is to be held, and the notice shall specify the object of the election. The notice shall be published at least once each week for a thirty (30) day period preceding the election. At the election the ballots shall contain the words “for the county sales and use tax” and “against the county sales and use tax”. If a portion of the proceeds from the tax will be used for economic development as provided by W.S. 39-16-211(a)(i), the ballot shall contain the words “a portion (or specific percentage) of the proceeds will be used for economic development” in a clear and appropriate manner. If the proposition is approved the same proposition shall be submitted at subsequent general elections as provided in this subparagraph until the proposition is defeated. If the tax proposed is approved after July 1, 1989, the same proposition shall be submitted at every other subsequent general election until the proposition is defeated. However in those counties where the tax is not in effect, the county commissioners with the concurrence of the governing bodies of fifty percent (50%) of the municipalities may establish the initial term of the tax at four (4) years. The term of the tax shall be stated in the proposition submitted to the voters. If a proposition establishing the term of the tax at four (4) years is approved, the proposition shall be submitted at the second general election following the election at which the proposition was initially approved and at the general election held every four (4) years thereafter until the proposition is defeated;

If the proposition to impose or continue the tax is defeated the proposition shall not again be submitted to the electors of the county for at least eleven (11) months. If the proposition is defeated at any general election following initial adoption of the proposition the tax is repealed and shall not be collected following June 30 of the year immediately following the year in which the proposition is defeated except:

If the proposition was for less than the full amount authorized in W.S. 39-16-204(a)(i), this subparagraph shall not prohibit a separate proposition for the remaining authorized amount of the tax as provided in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph;

If the proposition was to increase the amount of the tax originally adopted by the electors, the defeat of the proposition to increase the amount of the tax shall not repeal the proposition originally adopted by the electors.

If the proposition is approved by the qualified electors or under subparagraph (F) of this paragraph, the board of county commissioners shall by ordinance impose an excise tax upon services and upon sales and storage, use and consumption of tangible personal property. The board of county commissioners shall adopt an ordinance for the tax authorized by W.S. 39-16-204(a)(i). The ordinance shall include the following:

A provision imposing an excise tax upon every retail sale of tangible personal property, admissions and services made within the county and upon sales made within the county and storage, use and consumption of tangible personal property in the county at the rate approved by the electors or under subparagraph (F) of this paragraph, whichever is appropriate;

Provisions identical to those contained in article 1 of this chapter, insofar as it relates to use taxes, except the name of the county as the taxing agency shall be substituted for that of the state and an additional license to engage in business shall not be required if the vendor has been issued a state license pursuant to law;

A provision that any amendments made to article 1 or to chapter 15 not in conflict with article 1 of this chapter or to chapter 15 shall automatically become a part of the sales tax ordinances of the county;

A provision that the county shall contract with the department prior to the effective date of the county use tax ordinances whereby the department shall perform all functions incident to the administration of the use tax ordinances of the county, city or town;

A provision that the amount subject to the tax shall not include the amount of any sales or use tax imposed by the state of Wyoming.

In lieu of the requirements of subparagraph (C) of this paragraph providing for the submission of the proposition at subsequent elections, the tax authorized under W.S. 39-16-204(a)(i) may be continued by an election or by a resolution as provided in this subparagraph. For the tax to be continued by an election, the county commissioners, with the concurrence of the governing bodies of fifty percent (50%) of the municipalities, shall submit a proposition to the voters establishing the term of the tax as permanent. The proposition under this subparagraph shall be submitted in the same manner as a proposition to impose the tax under subparagraph (C) of this paragraph provided that the proposition shall be submitted as a separate question at the same election with a proposition to impose or continue the tax under subparagraph (C) of this paragraph. The tax may be continued by resolution, subject to the following terms and conditions:

The tax shall be initially imposed following approval of the electorate in accordance with subparagraphs (B) and (C) of this paragraph;

The tax shall be continued if favorably supported by a resolution adopted by the governing body of the county and by ordinances adopted by the governing bodies of at least a majority of the incorporated municipalities within the county;

Ordinances under this subparagraph shall conform with subdivisions (E)(I) through (V) of this paragraph;

Excise taxes shall be continued under this subparagraph only if the county clerk has certified to the county treasurer that a sufficient number of ordinances or resolutions to continue the tax under this subparagraph have been adopted at least ninety (90) days prior to the election to determine the continuation of the tax. Within five (5) days of receipt of such certification from the county clerk, the county treasurer shall notify the department of revenue of this tax. If the tax is not continued pursuant to this subparagraph it shall be subject to the provisions of subparagraph (C) of this paragraph for continuation;

The tax may be terminated in the same manner as it was continued under subdivisions (II) and (IV) of this subparagraph except that ordinances and resolutions shall be for the rescinding of the tax. If the tax is continued under subdivisions (II) and (IV) of this subparagraph, it may also be terminated by an election to rescind the tax conducted subject to subparagraphs (B) through (D) of this paragraph.

The following provisions apply to imposition of the specific purpose excise tax under W.S. 39-16-204(a)(ii):

Before any proposition to impose the tax or incur the debt shall be placed before the electors, the governing body of a county and the governing bodies of at least fifty percent (50%) of the incorporated municipalities within the county shall adopt a resolution approving the proposition, setting forth a procedure for qualification of a ballot question for placement on the ballot and specifying how excess funds shall be expended;

The revenue from the tax shall be used in a specified amount for specific purposes authorized by the qualified electors. Specific purposes may include one (1) time major maintenance, renovation or reconstruction of a specifically defined section of a public roadway and may include, in conjunction with another specific purpose, funding a reserve account as provided in subparagraph (H) of this paragraph. Specific purposes shall not include ordinary operations of local government except those operations related to a specific project or as authorized by subparagraph (H) of this paragraph;

No tax shall be imposed under this subsection until the proposition to impose the tax for specific purposes in specific amounts is approved by the vote of the majority of the qualified electors voting on the proposition. The amount of revenue to be collected and the purpose or purposes for which it is proposed to be used shall be specified in the proposition. The election shall be held in accordance with W.S.

22-21-101

through

22-21-112

. Any debt created may also be repaid, in whole or in part, by a property tax levy if general obligation bonds are authorized by the electors. If a county seeks to increase a tax rate previously approved by the qualified electors of the county that increase shall be separately proposed and voted upon, provided that the total amount of the separate propositions is subject to the limitations specified in W.S. 39-16-204(a)(ii) and (iii). Provided, any excise tax imposed under this subsection shall commence as provided by W.S.

39-16-207

(c) following the election approving the imposition of the tax, except that it shall commence on the first day of any subsequent month following the receipt of tax funds in the approved amount by any tax previously imposed under this subsection as provided by subparagraph (E) of this paragraph. Unless terminated earlier by the sponsoring entities pursuant to subparagraph (G) of this paragraph, the relevant portion of the tax shall terminate as provided by W.S. 39-16-207(c) when the amount approved by the electors is collected;

No debt may be incurred or approved which when added to the existing indebtedness of the sponsoring entity or entities, would exceed the constitutional debt limitation of the sponsoring entity or entities. However, nothing herein prohibits the approval of a proposition which establishes a fund for accumulation of funds sufficient to carry out the purpose approved or to pay a sufficient amount of the cost so as to bring the remainder of the debt within the debt limitation of the sponsoring entity or entities;

Upon certification of the election results by the county clerk to the treasurer, the county treasurer shall, within ten (10) days, notify the department of revenue of the requirement for imposition of any tax under this subsection and shall, upon the estimated collection of all tax funds in the amount approved, notify the department of revenue that the special sales tax levy is terminated. When determining the point in time in which to terminate the tax, the county treasurer in consultation with the department shall estimate future receipts of tax collections to minimize excess collection. The county treasurer shall make his best effort to ensure that sufficient money is collected while minimizing any excess collection. In no event shall the action or inaction of the county treasurer or the department be deemed to prohibit the collection of the full amount of the tax approved by the voters. The department of revenue shall, upon notification, inform all holders of sales and use tax licenses within the county of the requirement for the collection and payment of the additional tax. After receipt of notice that the amount has been collected or that the sponsoring entities have terminated the tax pursuant to subparagraph (G) of this paragraph, the department shall notify the license holders of the termination of the tax;

The first county imposing the tax provided by this act shall be responsible for payment of costs incurred by the department to initially set up computer records and support systems for administration of this tax. These costs shall be withheld by the department from the proceeds to be distributed pursuant to the preceding paragraph until such costs are fully recovered;

The sponsoring entities may agree to terminate the tax if the tax collected reaches the actual cost of the completed projects and the amount specified in the proposition exceeds the actual cost of the completed projects. The sponsoring entities shall inform the department of revenue and the county treasurer that the tax is terminated;

If approved in the resolution adopted pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph and approved by the qualified electors pursuant to subparagraph (C) of this paragraph, a specified amount of revenue from the tax or the tax revenue from a specified period not to exceed the specified amount may be deposited into a reserve account. Funds in the reserve account may be invested as provided in W.S.

9-4-831

and may be expended for specific purposes previously authorized under this paragraph and for the ordinary operations of local government. A reserve account under this paragraph may be designated as a maintenance and sinking fund for a specific project or projects and the earnings and principal amount in the fund may be expended for the applicable project or projects. A reserve account under this paragraph may be designated as an inviolate account to constitute a permanent or perpetual trust fund which shall be invested in a manner to obtain the highest return possible consistent with preservation of the corpus. Any earnings from investment of the corpus of a permanent or perpetual trust fund designated under this subsection shall be deposited in a separate account and may be expended as authorized in this subparagraph.

The following provisions apply to imposition of the resort district excise tax under W.S. 39-16-204(a)(iv):

The tax shall be imposed if favorably supported by a resolution adopted by the board of the resort district and approved by a majority of the district voters under W.S.

18-16-119

. If a resort district seeks to increase a tax rate previously approved by the district voters that increase shall be separately proposed and voted upon, provided that the total amount of the separate propositions is subject to the limitations specified in W.S. 39-16-204(a)(iv);

The tax may be terminated by a resolution to rescind the tax adopted by the board of the resort district.

The following provisions apply to imposition of the excise tax under W.S. 39-16-204(a)(v) the purpose of which is economic development:

No tax shall be imposed under W.S. 39-16-204(a)(v) until the proposition to impose the tax is submitted to the vote of the qualified electors of the county, and a majority of those casting their ballots vote in favor of imposing the taxes. If a county seeks to increase a tax rate previously approved by the qualified electors of the county that increase shall be separately proposed and voted upon, provided that the total amount of the separate propositions is subject to the limitations specified in W.S. 39-16-204(a)(iii) and (v). Except as otherwise provided, excise taxes imposed under this paragraph shall commence as provided by W.S. 39-16-207 following the election approving the imposition of the tax;

The proposition to impose an excise tax shall be at the expense of the county and be submitted to the electors of the county upon the receipt by the board of county commissioners of a petition requesting the election signed by at least five percent (5%) of the electors of the county or of a resolution approving the proposition from the governing body of the county and the governing bodies of at least fifty percent (50%) of the incorporated municipalities within the county. If proposed by petition by electors, the number of electors required shall be determined by the number of votes cast at the last general election. The election shall be at the direction and under the supervision of the board of county commissioners;

The proposition may be submitted at an election held on a date authorized under W.S.

22-21-103

. A notice of election shall be given in at least one (1) newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the election is to be held, and the notice shall specify the object of the election. The notice shall be published at least once each week for a thirty (30) day period preceding the election. At the election the ballots shall contain the words “for the county sales and use tax for economic development” and “against the county sales and use tax for economic development”. If the tax proposed is approved the same proposition shall be submitted at every other subsequent general election until the proposition is defeated. However, the county commissioners with the concurrence of the governing bodies of fifty percent (50%) of the municipalities may establish the initial term of the tax at four (4) years. The term of the tax shall be stated in the proposition submitted to the voters. If a proposition establishing the term of the tax at four (4) years is approved, the proposition shall be submitted at the second general election following the election at which the proposition was initially approved and at the general election held every four (4) years thereafter until the proposition is defeated;

If the proposition to impose or continue the tax is defeated the proposition shall not again be submitted to the electors of the county for at least eleven (11) months. If the proposition is defeated at any general election following initial adoption of the proposition the tax is repealed and shall not be collected following June 30 of the year immediately following the year in which the proposition is defeated except:

If the proposition was for less than the full amount authorized in W.S. 39-16-204(a)(v), this subparagraph shall not prohibit a separate proposition for the remaining authorized amount of the tax as provided in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph;

If the proposition was to increase the amount of the tax originally adopted by the electors, the defeat of the proposition to increase the amount of the tax shall not repeal the proposition originally adopted by the electors.

If the proposition is approved by the qualified electors, the board of county commissioners shall by ordinance impose an excise tax upon services and upon sales and storage, use and consumption of tangible personal property. The board of county commissioners shall adopt an ordinance for the tax authorized by W.S. 39-16-204(a)(v). The ordinance shall include the following:

A provision imposing an excise tax upon every retail sale of tangible personal property, admissions and services made within the county and upon sales made within the county and storage, use and consumption of tangible personal property in the county at the rate approved by the electors;

Provisions identical to those contained in article 1 of this chapter, insofar as it relates to use taxes, except the name of the county as the taxing agency shall be substituted for that of the state and an additional license to engage in business shall not be required if the vendor has been issued a state license pursuant to law;

A provision that any amendments made to article 1 or to chapter 15 not in conflict with article 1 of this chapter or to chapter 15 shall automatically become a part of the sales tax ordinances of the county;

A provision that the county shall contract with the department prior to the effective date of the county use tax ordinances whereby the department shall perform all functions incident to the administration of the use tax ordinances of the county, city or town;

A provision that the amount subject to the tax shall not include the amount of any sales or use tax imposed by the state of Wyoming.

The tax may be terminated by an election to rescind the tax conducted subject to subparagraphs (B) through (D) of this paragraph;

In no event shall any of the revenue collected from the tax imposed under this paragraph be expended, either directly or indirectly, to finance or involuntarily acquire any public utility as defined in W.S.

37-1-101

or any telecommunications system by condemnation or other legal process.

The following provisions apply to imposition of the municipal tax under W.S. 39-16-204(a)(vi):

The tax authorized by W.S. 39-16-204(a)(vi) shall be in addition to and not in lieu of any tax imposed by a county under W.S. 39-16-204(a)(i), (ii) or (v) if those taxes are imposed;

If a county has imposed at least one percent (1%) of the tax under W.S. 39-16-204(a)(i) and has voted to initially approve or continue a tax under W.S. 39-16-204(a)(ii), or if the county has adopted a resolution by the county under subparagraph (J) of this paragraph, a city or town within the county where the tax was imposed may propose an excise tax as provided in this paragraph. Except for a tax authorized under subparagraph (J) of this paragraph, the tax shall not be proposed until at least ninety (90) days following the approval or continuation of a tax under W.S. 39-16-204(a)(ii). The amount of the tax proposed under this subparagraph shall not exceed the amount of tax that the city or town collects during the same time period pursuant to the tax imposed under W.S. 39-16-204(a)(ii). The tax imposed under this paragraph shall terminate not more than ninety (90) days following the termination of the tax imposed under W.S. 39-16-204(a)(ii) or as provided in subparagraph (J) of this paragraph;

Revenue from the tax shall be used for general purposes or for a specific purpose in a specified amount as specified in the proposition to impose the tax. A city or town may impose a portion of the tax for separate purposes provided that the purposes are voted on separately, each proposition specifies the purpose of the tax and the total amount of the tax does not exceed the full amount authorized in W.S. 39-16-204(a)(vi) and subparagraph (B) of this paragraph;

No tax shall be imposed under this paragraph until a specific proposition to impose the tax is approved by a vote of the majority of the qualified electors voting on the specific proposition at an election on a day authorized for bond elections under W.S. 22-21-103. The purpose of the tax and the maximum estimated amount of revenue to be collected shall be specified in the proposition. The election shall be held in accordance with W.S.

22-21-101

through

22-21-112

. Any excise tax imposed under this paragraph shall commence as provided by W.S. 39-16-207(c) following the election approving the imposition of the tax;

A notice of election shall be given in at least one (1) newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the election is to be held, and the notice shall specify the proposition that will be considered at the election. The notice shall be published at least once each week for a thirty (30) day period preceding the election. At the election for each proposition, the ballots shall contain the words “for the municipal sales and use tax” and “against the municipal sales and use tax”. The ballot shall describe the purposes of the tax in a clear and appropriate manner;

If the proposition to impose or continue the tax is defeated the proposition shall not again be submitted to the electors of the city or town for at least eleven (11) months. If the proposition is defeated at any general election following initial adoption of the proposition the tax is repealed and shall not be collected following June 30 of the year immediately following the year in which the proposition is defeated except:

If the proposition was for less than the full amount authorized in W.S. 39-16-204(a)(vi), this subparagraph shall not prohibit a separate proposition for the remaining authorized amount of the tax as provided in subparagraphs (B) and (C) of this paragraph;

If the proposition was to increase the amount of the tax originally adopted by the electors or to impose a tax for a different purpose, subject to the maximum allowable tax amount, the defeat of the proposition shall not repeal the proposition originally adopted by the electors.

If the proposition is approved by the qualified electors, the city or town council shall adopt an ordinance for the tax authorized by W.S. 39-16-204(a)(vi) consistent with the approved proposition. The ordinance shall include the following:

A provision imposing a use tax upon sales and storage, use and consumption of tangible personal property made within the city or town, whichever is appropriate;

Provisions identical to those contained in article 1 of this chapter, insofar as it relates to use taxes, except the name of the city or town as the taxing agency shall be substituted for that of the state and an additional license to engage in business shall not be required if the vendor has been issued a state license pursuant to law;

A provision that any amendments made to article 1 of this chapter or to chapter 15 of this title not in conflict with article 1 of this chapter or to chapter 15 of this title shall automatically become a part of the use tax ordinances of the city or town;

A provision that the city or town shall contract with the department prior to the effective date of the use tax ordinances whereby the department shall perform all functions incident to the administration of the use tax ordinances of the city or town;

A provision that the amount subject to the use tax shall not include the amount of any use tax imposed by the state of Wyoming.

Subject to subparagraphs (B) and (J) of this paragraph, if the tax is imposed for a specific purpose and in a specified amount the tax shall terminate when the amount specified in the proposition approved by the electors is collected. A city or town may agree to terminate the tax if the tax collected reaches the actual cost of the completed projects and the amount specified in the proposition exceeds the actual cost of the completed projects. A city or town shall inform the department that a tax is terminated;

If a county has not imposed taxes under W.S. 39-16-204(a)(i) and 39-16-204(a)(ii) as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph,, the board of county commissioners may adopt a resolution to authorize cities and towns within the county to propose a municipal tax under this paragraph. The resolution shall establish the maximum taxation rate in increments of one-quarter of one percent (.25%) not to exceed a rate of one percent (1%). The proposition by a city or town for a municipal tax authorized under this subparagraph shall specify that the municipal tax shall terminate after two (2) years.

Basis of tax. The state preempts the field of imposing tax upon sales and storage, use and consumption of tangible personal property as provided by this article. No county, city, town or other political subdivision may impose, levy or collect taxes upon sales or storage, use or consumption of tangible personal property except as provided in this article.

Taxpayer. There are no specific applicable provisions for taxpayer for this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 2003, ch. 72, § 2; 2005, ch. 5, § 2; ch. 94, § 1; ch. 230, § 1; ch. 239, § 1; 2007, ch. 74, § 1; 2012, ch. 33, § 1; 2015 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 73, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2020 ch. 88, § 1, effective March 13, 2020; 2020 ch. 110, § 1, effective January 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 80, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 5, § 2, substituted “as provided by W.S. 39-15-207(c)” for “on the first day of the second month” in (a)(i)(A) and (a)(ii)(C), and also in (a)(ii)(C) for “on the last day of the month following the month,” and made a stylistic change.

Laws 2005, ch. 5, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 15, 2005.

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 94, § 1, effective and applicable to any tax imposed under (a)(ii) on or after July 1, 2005, in (a)(ii)(E), in the first sentence, substituted “estimated collection” for “receipt,” and inserted the second through fourth sentences.

The third 2005 amendment, by ch. 230, § 1, corrected an internal reference in (a)(i)(F).

Laws 2005, ch. 230, § 13, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2005.

The fourth 2005 amendment, by ch. 239, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, added the fifth sentence in (a)(i)(C); and added (a)(iv).

See the conflicting legislation note. This section is set out incorporating amendments made by all four 2005 acts.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a)(iii) substituted “provisions apply” for “provision applies”; and added (a)(iii)(B).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, added the present second sentence in (a)(ii)(B).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a)(iii)(F), substituted “department” for “state treasurer” twice.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(i)(A), added the second sentence and added “also” following “impose each tax” in the third sentence; in (a)(i)(D), added “except” at the end of the paragraph and added (a)(i)(D)(I) and (a)(i)(D)(II); in (a)(ii)(C), added the fifth sentence and added “relevant portion of the” preceding “tax” in the last sentence; in (a)(iii)(A), added the second sentence; in (a)(iv)(A), added the second sentence; in (a)(iv)(D), added “except” at the end of the paragraph and added (a)(iv)(D)(I) and (a)(iv)(D)(II); and made related changes.

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 88, § 1, in (a)(ii)(B) added “and may include, in conjunction with another specific purpose, funding a reserve account as provided in subparagraph (H) of this paragraph” at the end of the second sentence and “or as authorized by subparagraph (H) of this paragraph” at the end of the third sentence; and added (a)(ii)(H).

Laws 2020, ch. 88, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 110, § 1, effective January 1, 2021, substituted “fifty percent (50%)” for “two-thirds (2/3),” “initial term of the tax at two (4) years” for “initial term of the tax at two (2) four,” and “The term” for “If the term of the tax is limited to two (2) years, the term” throughout; in (a)(i)(C) and (a)(iv)(C) substituted “If a proposition establishing the term of the tax at four (4) years is approved” for “If approved” and “second general election following the election at which the proposition was initially approved and at the general election held every four (4) years thereafter” for “next general election and at every other subsequent general election thereafter”; in the introductory language of (a)(i)(F) added “by an election or by a resolution as provided in this subparagraph” at the end of the first sentence, added the second and third sentences, and added “The tax may be continued by resolution” at the beginning of the last sentence; and added (a)(v).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “at an election on a day authorized for bond elections under W.S.

22-21-103

” for “in a general election” in the first sentence of (a)(vi)(D).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 230, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”